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DI−294 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1268 / 68 Transfer L4 Position Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1268 /68 Openorshort circuit in transferL4positionswitch.
STransferL4positionswitch
STransferL4positionswitchcircuit

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check voltage between terminal EXI2 of skid control ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal EXI2 of skid control

ECU and body ground when transfer in L4 position.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in
problem symptoms chart (See page DI−206).

NG

2 Check transfer L4 position switch (Full−time 4WD type: See Pub. No. RM616E on
page TR−53).

NG Replace transfer L4 position switch.

OK

3 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between transfer L4
position switch and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between skid control
ECU and engine and ECT ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


